North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15 Education
CHAPTER 15-54.1 University System Capital Building Fund

15-54.1-01.
University system capital building fund — Creation — Continuing appropriation.

There is created in the state treasury the university system capital building fund. The university system capital building fund consists of moneys transferred to the fund and any interest and earnings of the fund. The state board of higher education may provide for the fund to be invested under the supervision of the state investment board. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the state board of higher education on a continuing basis for allocations to the institutions under the control of the state board of higher education for capital projects as directed by the legislative assembly and in accordance with this chapter. Any interest or earnings of the fund must be allocated to the capital building fund pool within the university system capital building fund.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 31, § 14, effective April 26, 2021; enacted by 2021, ch. 134, § 1, effective April 26, 2021.

Note.

Section 15-54.1-01 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 14 of Chapter 31, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2003; and Section 1 of Chapter 134, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2033.

15-54.1-02.
Capital building funds — Uses — Reports.

Subject to tier II and tier III capital building fund matching requirements under this chapter, each institution may use its allocation of funds from the university system capital building fund for projects specifically authorized by the legislative assembly to use university system capital building fund moneys. In addition, after an institution has matched and committed seventy-five percent of the funding appropriated for the institution’s tier I extraordinary repairs and subject to state board of higher education approval and matching requirements under this chapter, each institution may use its allocation of funds from the university system capital building fund for extraordinary repairs and deferred maintenance projects that do not increase the overall square footage of a building. The state board of higher education shall report biennially to the legislative management and to the appropriations committees of the legislative assembly on the use of funding in the university system capital building fund, the source of matching funds, and each institution’s five-year plan for capital construction spending.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 31, § 14, effective April 26, 2021; enacted by 2021, ch. 134, § 1, effective April 26, 2021.

Note.

Section 15-54.1-02 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 14 of Chapter 31, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2003; and Section 1 of Chapter 134, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2033.

15-54.1-03.
Tier II capital building funds — Matching requirements.

The state board of higher education may allocate tier II capital building fund moneys to an institution for a project only after the institution provides one dollar of matching funds from operations or other sources for each one dollar from the university system capital building fund for the project. An institution may not use tier I extraordinary repairs funding, tier III capital building fund moneys, or state funding appropriated for a specific capital project as matching funds under this section.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 31, § 14, effective April 26, 2021; enacted by 2021, ch. 134, § 1, effective April 26, 2021.

Note.

Section 15-54.1-03 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 14 of Chapter 31, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2003; and Section 1 of Chapter 134, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2033.

15-54.1-04.
Tier III capital building funds — Matching requirements.

The state board of higher education may allocate tier III capital building fund moneys to an institution only after the institution provides two dollars of matching funds from operations or other sources for each one dollar from the university system capital building fund for the project. An institution may not use tier I extraordinary repairs funding, tier II capital building fund moneys, or state funding appropriated for a specific capital project as matching funds under this section.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 31, § 14, effective April 26, 2021; enacted by 2021, ch. 134, § 1, effective April 26, 2021.

Note.

Section 15-54.1-04 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 14 of Chapter 31, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2003; and Section 1 of Chapter 134, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2033.

15-54.1-05.
Capital building fund pool.

If the state board of higher education has not allocated capital building fund moneys to an institution by January first of the third biennium after the funding was appropriated or transferred to the fund, the board shall reallocate the funds to a pool within the university system capital building fund. Any institution under the control of the state board of higher education that has fully matched and committed its university system capital building fund allocation may apply for and be allocated funding from the capital building fund pool, subject to state board of higher education approval and tier III capital building fund matching requirements under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 31, § 14, effective April 26, 2021; enacted by 2021, ch. 134, § 1, effective April 26, 2021.

Note.

Section 15-54.1-05 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly.

Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09. 1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 14 of Chapter 31, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2003; and Section 1 of Chapter 134, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2033.